Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-3004
Annual financial literacy status report.

On or before December 31, 2024, and on or before December 31 of each year thereafter, in order to promote and support financial literacy education, each school district shall provide an annual financial literacy status report to its school board, including, but not limited to, student progress in financial literacy courses and other district determined measures of financial literacy progress from the previous school year.

Laws 2021, LB452, § 4.